en: Coloring finish: Fluorescent; Glitter; Matte; Metallic; Neon; Pastel; Pearl/lustre; Standard; Other
th: การตกแต่งสี: ฟลูออเรสเซนต์; กลิตเตอร์; ด้าน; เมทัลลิก; นีออน; พาสเทล; มุก/มันวาว; มาตรฐาน; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Финиш на оцветяването: Флуоресцентно; С брокат; Мат; Металик; Неон; Пастелно; Перла/блясък; Стандартно; Друго
ja: 着色仕上げ: 蛍光; グリッター; マット; メタリック; ネオン; パステル; パール/光沢; スタンダード; その他
ro-RO: Finisaj de colorare: Fluorescent; Sclipici; Mat; Metalizat; Neon; Pastel; Perlat/lucios; Standard; Altele
lt-LT: Dažymo apdaila: Fluorescencinis; Su blizgučiais; Matinis; Metalizuotas; Neoninis; Pastelinis; Perlamutrinis / žvilgantis; Standartinis; Kita
hu: Színezés felülete: Fluoreszkáló; Csillámos; Matt; Fémes; Neon; Pasztell; Gyöngyházfényű / ragyogó; Normál; Egyéb
es: Acabado del color: Fluorescente; Con brillantina; Mate; Metálico; Neón; Pastel; Perlado/lustroso; Estándar; Otro
sl-SI: Končna obdelava z barvanjem: Fluorescentno; Z bleščicami; Mat; Kovinsko; Neonsko; Pastelno; Biserno/sijajno; Standardno; Drugo
ko: 착색 마감: 형광; 글리터; 무광; 메탈릭; 네온; 파스텔; 펄/광택; 표준; 기타
fr: Finition de coloration: Fluorescent; Pailleté; Mat; Métallisé; Néon; Pastel; Nacré/lustré; Standard; Autre
sk-SK: Farebná povrchová úprava: Fluorescenčné; Trblietavé; Matné; Metalické; Neónové; Pastelové; Perleťové/lesklé; Štandardné; Iné
nl: Kleurafwerking: Fluorescerend; Glitter; Mat; Metallic; Neon; Pastel; Parelmoer/glans; Standaard; Overige
sv: Färgfinish: Fluorescerande; Glitter; Matt; Metallic; Neon; Pastell; Pärlemor/lyster; Standard; Övrigt
vi: Hoàn thiện màu sắc: Huỳnh quang; Lấp lánh; Mờ; Ánh kim; Neon; Pastel; Ngọc trai/óng ánh; Tiêu chuẩn; Khác
pt-BR: Acabamento da coloração: Fluorescente; Glitter; Fosco; Metálico; Neon; Pastel; Perolado/lustroso; Padrão; Outro
hr-HR: Završna obrada bojanja: Fluorescentno; Šljokičasto; Mat; Metalik; Neonsko; Pastelno; Biserno/sjajno; Standardno; Ostalo
pl: Wykończenie kolorystyczne: Fluorescencyjne; Brokatowe; Matowe; Metaliczne; Neonowe; Pastelowe; Perłowe / z połyskiem; Standardowe; Inne
fi: Väritysviimeistely: Fluoresoiva; Kimalle; Matta; Metallinen; Neon; Pastelli; Helmiäinen/hohtava; Vakio; Muu
nb: Fargeleggingsfinish: Fluorescerende; Glitter; Matt; Metallisk; Neon; Pastell; Perle/glans; Standard; Annet
cs: Povrchová úprava barvením: Fluorescenční; Třpytivý; Matný; Metalický; Neonový; Pastelový; Perleťový / lesklý; Standardní; Ostatní
pt-PT: Acabamento de coloração: Fluorescente; Glitter; Mate; Metálico; Néon; Pastel; Pérola/lustroso; Padrão; Outro
tr: Boyama efekti: Floresan; Simli; Mat; Metalik; Neon; Pastel; Sedefli/parlak; Standart; Diğer
el: Φινίρισμα χρωματισμού: Φθορίζον; Γκλίτερ; Ματ; Μεταλλικό; Νέον; Παστέλ; Περλέ/Ιριδίζον; Τυπικό; Άλλο
da: Farvefinish: Fluorescerende; Glimmer; Mat; Metallisk; Neon; Pastel; Perlemor/glans; Standard; Andet
ru: Финиш окрашивания: Флуоресцентное; С блестками; Матовое; Металлик; Неоновое; Пастельное; Перламутровое/с отливом; Стандартное; Другое
zh-TW: 著色效果: 螢光; 亮片; 霧面; 金屬色; 霓虹; 粉彩; 珍珠/光澤; 標準; 其他
zh-CN: 着色饰面: 荧光; 闪光; 哑光; 金属色; 霓虹; 柔和色; 珍珠色/光泽; 标准; 其他
it: Finitura colorante: Fluorescente; Glitterato; Opaco; Metallizzato; Neon; Pastello; Perlato/Lustro; Standard; Altro
de: Farbfinish: Fluoreszierend; Glitzer; Matt; Metallic; Neon; Pastell; Perlmutt/Glanz; Standard; Sonstige